Utah statutes.
54-8a-3.5.   Excavation-related information included with construction and
building permit.
An entity issuing a permit for building or construction that may require
excavation may, and is encouraged to, include a notice on or with a permit
stating, "Attention, Utah law requires any excavator to notify the owner of
underground facilities 48 hours before excavating and comply with Utah Code
Title 54, Chapter 8a, Damage to Underground Utility Facilities."
